South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5170.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-39-15 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 12-39-15.  (A) A county auditor annually shall complete satisfactorily a minimum of eighteen hours of continuing education courses that the department establishes or causes to be established. The department may offer any or all of the required courses virtually. Failure to complete satisfactorily these courses in any year results in the auditor forfeiting one thousand dollars of his state salary supplement for that year as provided in the annual general appropriations act. The content, cost, and dates of the courses must be determined by the department. (B) The department, for reasonable cause, may excuse a county auditor from attending these courses for any year. If excused, the auditor does not forfeit one thousand dollars of his state salary supplement for that year. SECTION 2.  Section 12-45-15 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 12-45-15.  (A) A county treasurer annually shall complete satisfactorily a minimum of eighteen hours of continuing education courses that the department establishes or causes to be established. The department may offer any or all of the required courses virtually. Failure to complete satisfactorily these courses in any year results in the treasurer forfeiting one thousand dollars of his state salary supplement for the year as is provided in the annual general appropriations act. The content, cost, and dates of the courses must be determined by the department. (B) The department, for reasonable cause, may excuse a county treasurer from attending these courses for any year. If excused, the treasurer does not forfeit one thousand dollars of his state salary supplement for that year. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----